Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
USES OF ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION TRUST AGREEMENT MONEYS
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.795 is amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.807:
(1) “Alternative fuel” means biofuels,  biogas, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, hydrogen and
electricity.
(2) “Best available exhaust control  technology” means the most effective exhaust controls to
reduce diesel particulate that rely on passively regenerated  diesel particulate control technology
supported in a vehicle’s normal duty cycle.
[(3) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005. ]
[(4)] (3)  “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost, in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate
matter reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
[(5)] (4) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine.
[(6)] (5) “Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement” means the fully executed Environmental
Mitigation Trust Agreement  for State Beneficiaries effective October 2, 2017, and issued pur-
suant to Paragraph 17 of  [ required by ] the Volkswagen “Clean  Diesel” Marketing, Sales Practices
and Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
[(7)] (6)  “Equivalent equipment” means a piece of equipment that  performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
[(8)] (7) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle  that performs the same function and
is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
(8) “Gross vehicle weight rating” means the value specified by the  manufacturer as the
maximum loaded weight of a single or a combination vehicle.
(9) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor vehicle  or combination of vehicles operated as a unit that
has a [ combined weight ] gross vehicle weight rating  that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
(10) “Incremental cost” means the cost of a  qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline cost
that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 1
(11) “Medium-duty truck” means a motor vehicle  or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has  a [ combined weight ] gross vehicle weight rating  that is greater than 14,000 pounds but
less than or equal to 26,000 pounds.
(12) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(13) “Nonroad diesel engine” means a diesel engine  of 25 horsepower or more that is not de-
signed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways.
[(14) “Oregon diesel engine” means an engine at least 50 percent of the use  of which, as measured
by miles driven or hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years following  the repowering
or retrofitting of the engine. ]
[(15)] (14) “Oregon  diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50 percent of
the use of which, as  measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(16)] (15) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(17)(a)] (16)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel  engine and replace the motor vehicle with an
equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel  engine and replace the equip-
ment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement of  a diesel en-
gine.
[(18)] (17) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and substitute it  with a new engine,
a used engine or a remanufactured engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with a  min-
imum useful life of seven years.
[(19)] (18) “Retrofit” means  to equip a diesel engine with new emissions-reducing parts or tech-
nology  after  the manufacture of the original engine  or to convert the diesel engine into an engine
capable of being powered by alternative fuel . A retrofit must use  the greatest degree of emissions
reduction available for the particular application  of the equipment retrofitted that meets the cost-
effectiveness threshold.
[(20)] (19) “Scrap” means to destroy, render inoperable and recycle.
[(21)] (20) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of  vehicles operated as a unit that has
a [ combined weight ] gross vehicle weight rating  that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468A.805 is amended to read:
468A.805. (1) Subject to and consistent  with ORS 468A.803 (8) and with the terms of the Envi-
ronmental Mitigation Trust Agreement, any moneys received by the  State of Oregon pursuant to the
agreement that are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund  under ORS 468A.801 must [ be used
by the Department of Environmental Quality to award grants for the purpose of reducing  nitrogen
oxides emissions from diesel engines. ]
[(2)(a) To the extent authorized by the agreement, the department shall allocate moneys awarded
pursuant to  subsection (1) of this section first to ] be expended by the Department of Environ-
mental Quality as follows:
(a) The department shall  award grants to owners and operators of school buses to reduce
emissions from at least 450 school buses powered by diesel engines operating in this state.
(b) Moneys not expended under paragraph (a) of this subsection must be:
(A) Awarded as grants for the purpose of reducing emissions from diesel engines; or
(B) Utilized by the department as the State of Oregon’s voluntary matching funds  under
the Diesel Emissions Reduction Act Program  in the Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C.
16133, and for the purpose of awarding  grants for reducing diesel particulate matter emis-
sions from diesel engines.
[(b)] (2)(a)  In awarding grants under [ this subsection ] subsection (1)(a) of this section , the
department shall begin by awarding grants  to owners and operators of school buses powered by
diesel engines that  are of the median model year of school buses powered by diesel engines operat-
ing in this  state, and shall proceed to award grants for school buses powered by diesel engines
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 2
through the  adjoining model years until the requirements of [ paragraph (a) of this subsection ] sub-
section (1)(a) of this section  are met. A grant may be awarded under [ this subsection ] subsection
(1)(a) of this  section for any school bus powered by a diesel engine within the control of an owner
or operator that meets the following conditions:
(A) The school bus has at least three years of remaining useful life;
(B) Use of the school bus has occurred in Oregon during the year preceding the date of  the
grant; and
(C) For the  three years following receipt of a grant award, use of the school bus to which the
owner or operator applies the grant will occur in Oregon.
[(c)] (b)  The grant amount per school bus awarded under [ this paragraph ] subsection (1)(a) of
this section  shall be for:
(A) $50,000 or 30  percent of the cost to purchase a school bus that meets minimum standards
adopted by the  State Board of Education under ORS 820.100 for the applicable class or type of
school bus, whichever is less; or
(B) Up to 100 percent  of the cost to retrofit a school bus with emissions-reducing parts or
technology that results in a reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions  by at least 85 percent
when compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(3) Except for awarding grants pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the  department may not
award grants from the moneys described under subsection (1)  of this section without prior approval
by the Legislative Assembly by law. ]
(3) In awarding grants  pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the department shall
give preference to projects that will:
(a) Support compliance with section 4 of this 2019 Act  or with contract specifications or
preferences related to emissions standards for diesel engines established by a public body,
as defined in ORS 174.109;
(b) Be carried  out by a grant applicant that is a disadvantaged business enterprise, a
minority-owned business, a woman-owned business,  a business that a service-disabled vet-
eran owns or an emerging small business, as those terms are defined in ORS 200.005;
(c) Involve the replacement, repower or retrofit of one or more motor vehicles  or pieces
of equipment that have at least three  years of remaining useful life at the time that the
grant agreement is executed;
(d) Support the utilization of fuels for which regulated parties may  generate credits un-
der the clean fuels program adopted  by rule by the Environmental Quality Commission under
ORS 468A.266 (1)(b);
(e) Benefit owners and operators of heavy-duty trucks, if the fleet of the owner  or op-
erator includes  only one heavy-duty truck and the heavy-duty truck is registered in
Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington County;
(f) Benefit small fleets other than as described in paragraph (e) of this subsection;
(g) Involve the retrofit of concrete mixer trucks or trucks  that are used for the trans-
portation of aggregate; or
(h) Meet the criteria of  any other preferences that the commission may establish by rule,
if the department determines that the  additional preferences are necessary to ensure that
grant awards result in the reduction of emissions from diesel engines.
(4) The commission may adopt rules  as necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
TITLING AND REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN VEHICLES; DIESEL
ENGINE REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2019 Act are added to  and made a part of the Oregon
Vehicle Code.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section and section 5 of this 2019 Act:
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 3
(a) “Diesel engine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(b) “Heavy-duty truck” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(c) “Medium-duty truck” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(d) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(2) On and after January 1, 2025, the Department of Transportation may not  issue a
certificate of title for the following motor vehicles  if the address of the owner of the motor
vehicle is located within Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington County:
(a) A medium-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine.
(b) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year 2006 or older diesel engine.
(3) The department may not  issue registration or renewal of registration on and after the
following dates for the following motor vehicles if the address of  the owner of the motor
vehicle is located within Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington County:
(a) January 1, 2023, for a medium-duty truck or a  heavy-duty truck if the motor vehicle
is powered by a model year 1996 or older diesel engine.
(b) January 1, 2029, for:
(A) A medium-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine.
(B) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine owned  by a
public body.
(C) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year 2006 or older diesel engine owned by a
person other than a public body.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the department may  issue a
certificate of title, issue registration or issue renewal of registration for  a motor vehicle
described in  subsection (2) or (3) of this section after a date described in subsection (2) or
(3) of this section if:
(a) The  diesel engine that powers the motor vehicle has been retrofitted with approved
retrofit technology  pursuant to rules adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission
under section 7 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Proof of certification of the retrofit has been issued under section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(5) The following motor vehicles are exempt from the requirements of this section:
(a) Motor vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(b) Farm tractors.
(c) Implements of husbandry.
(d) Motor vehicles used exclusively as training vehicles.
(e) Publicly and privately owned emergency vehicles.
(f) Ambulances.
(g) Campers.
(h) Motor homes.
(i) Recreational vehicles.
(j) Heavy-duty trucks operated for 5,000 miles  or fewer on highways of this state during
one calendar year.
(k) Carriers with a fleet size of five or fewer heavy-duty trucks.
(L) Antique vehicles.
(m) Motor trucks, as defined in ORS 801.355, used primarily to transport logs.
(6)(a) In order for registration to continue to be valid  for a motor vehicle that is owned
by a public body and subject to subsection (3) of this section, the  public body shall, in a
manner determined by the department by rule, submit proof to the  department that the
motor vehicle complies with  subsection (3) of this section. Proof of compliance must be on
a form supplied by the department and must  include such information as the department
may require. Proof  of compliance for a motor vehicle owned by a public body is valid until
the ownership of the vehicle changes.
(b) The department shall provide notice to a public body of the requirement under  this
subsection to submit  proof of compliance with subsection (3) of this section. The notice shall
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 4
be issued to the public body no later than one year  prior to the date that the proof of com-
pliance must be submitted to the department.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) No later than September 15 of each  year, the Department of Transpor-
tation shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to  transportation and the environment on the
registration of medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks  in this state. The purposes of the
report shall be to identify and address trends in the registration of medium-duty  trucks and
heavy-duty trucks in this state over time and to identify any effects that  the requirements
of section 4 of this 2019 Act may have on the trends in registration.
(2) The report shall include information on:
(a) The  number of medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks registered in each county
in this state; and
(b) The number of medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty  trucks registered in this state
that are motor vehicles described in section 4 (5) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2019 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 7. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by rule criteria  for
certification of approved retrofit technologies for the retrofit  of a diesel engine that powers
a medium-duty truck or  a heavy-duty truck. In determining the criteria and approved
retrofit technologies, the commission shall consider:
(a) Regulations adopted by the State of California for reducing diesel engine emissions
from in-use medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks; and
(b) The list  of technologies approved as qualifying retrofits included in the standards es-
tablished by the commission under ORS 468A.799.
(2) The commission shall prescribe by rule the manner for  issuing certification that a
diesel engine has been retrofitted with approved retrofit  technology in compliance with the
criteria adopted by rule under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) When  proof of certification that a diesel engine has been retrofitted with approved
retrofit technology is required  under section 4 of this 2019 Act, the proof may be provided
by any means that the Department of Transportation and the commission  determine by joint
rulemaking or by interagency agreement to be satisfactory.  Proof of certification may in-
clude, but need not be limited to, a certificate of compliance.
SECTION 8.  ORS 803.045 is amended to read:
803.045. (1) The Department of Transportation shall  issue title for a vehicle if the applicant and
the vehicle meet the following qualifications:
(a) The applicant  must satisfy the department that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and
is otherwise entitled to have title issued in the applicant’s name.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in  ORS 803.050 (2), the applicant must submit a completed and
signed application for title described in ORS 803.050.
(c) The applicant must pay the fee for issuance of a certificate of title under ORS 803.090  or the
fee for issuance of title in another form, as established by the department  by rule in accordance
with ORS 803.012.
(d) If the vehicle is a reconstructed vehicle  or an assembled vehicle, the applicant must provide
the following information in addition to any other information required under this section:
(A) The certificate of title last issued for the frame of the vehicle, a salvage title  certificate is-
sued for the vehicle or other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
(B) Bills of sale for major components used to build the vehicle.
(e) If the vehicle is covered by an Oregon title or salvage  title certificate, the applicant shall
surrender the Oregon title or salvage title certificate,  submit an application as provided under ORS
803.065 or submit other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
(f) Unless the department adopts rules  to the contrary, if the vehicle is from another jurisdic-
tion, the applicant shall surrender to  the department with the application the certificate of title is-
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 5
sued by the other jurisdiction, if such jurisdiction requires certificates of  title. If such jurisdiction
does not require certificates of title, then the applicant shall surrender the registration cards.
(g) If required by the department, the applicant must submit proof of ownership as  described
under ORS 803.205.
(h) Other than a  racing activity vehicle as defined in ORS 801.404, if the department has reason
to believe a vehicle was not certified by the original manufacturer as conforming  to federal vehicle
standards, the department may require the applicant to provide proof satisfactory to the department
that the vehicle conforms to federal vehicle standards.
(i) Unless the  vehicle is exempted from odometer disclosure requirements, the applicant shall
submit an appropriate odometer disclosure form. The department shall determine what  constitutes
an appropriate form in any particular situation. The department may make  exceptions by rule to the
requirement for submission of an odometer disclosure form.
(2)[(a)] The department may not issue title for a vehicle:
[(A)] (a)  Required by ORS 803.210  to be inspected unless the vehicle has been inspected as de-
scribed in ORS 803.212 and the inspection fee paid under ORS 803.215.
[(B)] (b) If the current vehicle title, certificate or ownership document is a junk title, junk cer-
tificate or similar ownership document issued by another jurisdiction, or  has a junk or similar brand
or notation.
(c) As prescribed in section 4 of this 2019 Act.
[(b)] (3) The department may adopt  any rules it considers necessary for the administration of
[this] subsection  (2)(a) and (b) of this section .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 815.095 is amended to read:
815.095. (1) A person commits the offense of making  unlawful sales of, installations of or re-
presentations concerning vehicle pollution control systems if the person does any of the following:
(a) Sells, displays, advertises or represents as a certified system  any motor vehicle pollution
control system that is not certified under ORS 468A.365.
(b) Sells, displays, advertises or represents as an approved retrofit technology  any
retrofit technology that is not approved under section 7 of this 2019 Act.
[(b)] (c) Installs or sells for installation upon a motor vehicle any motor vehicle pollution control
system for which a certificate of approval has not been issued under ORS 468A.365.
(2) The offense described in this section, making unlawful sales,  installations or representations
concerning vehicle pollution  control systems, is a Class A misdemeanor but each day of violation
does not constitute a separate offense.
SECTION 10.  ORS 815.305 is amended to read:
815.305. (1) A person commits  the offense of unlawful disconnection or alteration of pollution
control equipment if the person does any of the following:
(a) Disconnects or permits to be disconnected a factory installed  motor vehicle air pollution
control device or a factory-installed system, as defined in ORS 468A.350, or knowingly  and willfully
permits such device or factory-installed system to become or remain inoperative.
(b) Modifies or alters a certified  system or factory-installed system, as defined in ORS 468A.350,
in a manner that decreases its efficiency or effectiveness in the control of air pollution.
(c) Modifies or alters an installed, approved retrofit  technology for which proof of cer-
tification has  been issued under section 7 of this 2019 Act in a manner that decreases its
efficiency or effectiveness in the control of air pollution.
(2) The following exemptions to this section are established:
(a) This section does not apply when factory-installed motor vehicle air  pollution control
equipment, systems or devices are disconnected for the purpose of conversion to gaseous fuels  in-
cluding, but  not limited to, liquefied petroleum gases and natural gases in liquefied or gaseous form.
(b) This section is not intended to prohibit the use of replacement,  conversion, turbocharger or
other alternative components in a certified  or factory-installed system if the components do not
significantly affect the efficiency or effectiveness of the system in controlling air pollution.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 6
(3) The offense described in this section, unlawful disconnection or alteration of  pollution con-
trol equipment, is a Class A misdemeanor,  but each day of violation does not constitute a separate
offense.
SECTION 11.  ORS 815.315 is amended to read:
815.315. (1) A person commits the offense  of use of improper certificate for pollution control
system if the person makes, issues or knowingly uses any imitation or counterfeit of  a certificate
of compliance described under ORS 815.310  or section 7 of this 2019 Act .
(2) The offense described in this section, use of improper  certificate for pollution control system,
is a Class B traffic violation, but each day of violation does not constitute a separate offense.
SECTION 12.  ORS 815.320 is amended to read:
815.320. (1) A person commits  the offense of unlawful certification of compliance with pollution
control requirements if the person does any of the following:
(a) Falsely certifies that a motor vehicle is equipped with a  functioning certified system, as de-
fined in ORS  468A.350, or that the motor vehicle complies with the rules and standards adopted by
the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS 468A.360.
(b) Falsifies any information on the certificate of compliance described under ORS 815.310.
(c) Falsely certifies that a diesel engine has  been retrofitted with approved retrofit
technology under section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(d) Falsifies any  information on the certificate of compliance described under section 7
of this 2019 Act.
[(c)] (e)  With a purpose to defraud or with intent, causes registration of a motor vehicle that
would not otherwise be eligible for registration because of its failure to comply with :
(A) Rules and standards  adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS
468A.360; or
(B) Section 4 of this 2019 Act .
(2) The offense described in  this section, unlawful certification of compliance with pollution
control requirements, is a Class A  misdemeanor, but each day of violation does not constitute a
separate offense.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 815.325 is amended to read:
815.325. (1) A person commits the offense of  unlawfully requiring repair for certification with
pollution control requirements if the person requires as a condition  of the issuance of a certification
of compliance described  under ORS 815.310 or proof of certification described under section 7
of this 2019 Act  any repairs or services unnecessary for compliance with  section 4 of this 2019
Act or with  rules or standards adopted under ORS 468A.350, 468A.355, 468A.365 and 468A.385.
(2) The offense described in this  section, unlawfully requiring repair for certification of compli-
ance with pollution control requirements, is a Class A misdemeanor, but each day of violation  does
not constitute a separate offense.
VOLUNTARY EMISSIONS CONTROL LABEL PROGRAM
SECTION 14. Section 15 of this 2019 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
468A.
SECTION 15. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  adopt by rule a program
allowing for an owner or  operator of a piece of construction equipment powered by a nonroad
diesel engine and operated in Oregon to voluntarily demonstrate to the Department of En-
vironmental Quality  the emissions profile of the nonroad diesel engine powering the equip-
ment, and  to receive and display an emission control label on the piece of construction
equipment.
(2) The department may contract with an independent third-party to implement  the
program described in subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 7
(3) The commission may establish by rule a schedule  of fees for participation in the
program developed under this section. The fees established under this section shall  be based
upon the costs of the department in carrying out the program.
(4) The fees collected under subsection  (3) of this section shall be deposited into the State
Treasury to the credit of  an account of the department and are continuously appropriated
to the department  for payment of the costs of the department in carrying out the provisions
of this section.
MOTOR VEHICLE EMISSIONS STANDARDS; CIVIL PENALTIES
SECTION 16.  ORS 468.140 is amended to read:
468.140. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided  by law, any person who violates any of the
following shall incur a civil penalty for each day of violation in the amount prescribed by the
schedule adopted under ORS 468.130:
(a) The terms or conditions of any permit required or authorized by law  and issued by the De-
partment of Environmental Quality or a regional air quality control authority.
(b) Any  provision of ORS 164.785, 448.305, 454.010 to 454.040, 454.205 to 454.255, 454.505 to
454.535, 454.605 to 454.755 and 783.625 to 783.640  and ORS chapter 467 and ORS chapters 468, 468A
and 468B.
(c) Any rule or standard  or order of the Environmental Quality Commission adopted or issued
pursuant to ORS 448.305, 454.010 to 454.040, 454.205 to 454.255,  454.505 to 454.535, 454.605 to 454.755
and 783.625 to 783.640 and ORS chapter 467 and ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B.
(d) Any term or condition of a variance granted by the commission or department  pursuant to
ORS 467.060.
(e) Any rule or standard or order of a regional authority adopted or issued under authority of
ORS 468A.135.
(f) The  financial assurance requirement under ORS 468B.390 and 468B.485 or any rule related
to the financial assurance requirement under ORS 468B.390.
(2) Each day of violation under subsection (1) of this section constitutes a separate offense.
(3)(a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who  intentionally or
negligently  causes  or permits the discharge of oil or hazardous material into the waters of the state
or intentionally or negligently fails to clean up a spill or release of oil or hazardous material into
the waters of the state as required by ORS 466.645 shall incur a civil penalty not  to exceed the
amount of $100,000 for each violation.
(b) In addition to  any other penalty provided by law, the following persons shall incur a civil
penalty not to exceed the amount of $25,000 for each day of violation:
(A) Any person who violates the terms  or conditions of a permit authorizing waste discharge
into the air or waters of the state.
(B) Any person who violates any law, rule, order or standard in ORS 448.305,  454.010 to 454.040,
454.205 to 454.255,  454.505 to 454.535, 454.605 to 454.755 and 783.625 to 783.640 and ORS chapters
468, 468A and 468B relating to air or water pollution.
(C) Any person who violates the  provisions of a rule adopted or an order issued under ORS
459A.590.
(4) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates  the provisions of
ORS 468B.130 shall incur a civil penalty not  to exceed the amount of $1,000 for each day of vio-
lation.
[(5) Subsection (1)(c) and  (e) of this section does not apply to violations of motor vehicle emission
standards which are not violations of standards for control of noise emissions. ]
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(c)  and (e) of this section, the owner or lessee of a
motor vehicle may not incur a civil penalty for a violation  of the requirement that the owner
or lessee obtain a motor vehicle pollution control system certificate of compliance  issued
under ORS 468A.380.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 8
(6) Notwithstanding  the limits of ORS 468.130 (1) and in addition to any other penalty provided
by law, any person who intentionally or negligently causes or permits  open field burning contrary
to the provisions of ORS 468A.555 to 468A.620 and 468A.992, 476.380 and 478.960 shall  be assessed
by the department a civil penalty of at least $20 but not more than $40 for each acre so  burned.
Any amounts collected by the  department pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited with the
State Treasurer to  the credit of the General Fund and shall be available for general governmental
expense. As used in this subsection, “open field burning” does not include  propane flaming of mint
stubble.
CLEAN DIESEL IN PUBLIC CONTRACTS
SECTION 17. Section 18 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of the Public Con-
tracting Code.
SECTION 18. (1) As used in this section, “diesel engine,” “nonroad diesel  engine” and
“motor vehicle” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 468A.795.
(2) Except as provided in subsection  (4) of this section, a public improvement contract
must require at least 80 percent  of the total fleet of motor vehicles that are motor vehicles
powered by diesel engines and equipment powered by nonroad diesel engines used on site  and
in the course of performing the contract to be:
(a) Motor vehicles powered by model year 2010 or newer diesel engines; and
(b) Equipment powered by nonroad diesel engines, whether or not capable of being pow-
ered by alternative fuel, that meet or exceed United States Environmental Protection Agency
Tier 4 exhaust emission standards for nonroad compression ignition engines.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies only  to a public improvement contract for a
public improvement:
(a) With a value of $20 million or more;
(b) For which the contracting agency is a state contracting agency; and
(c) If the public improvement is  located within Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington
County.
(4)(a) The Department of  Environmental Quality may by order establish minimum
standards for contract  specifications relating to the use of diesel engines in the course of
performing a public improvement contract by a state contracting agency. In  establishing
standards under this subsection, the department shall take  into consideration methods for
assisting contractors certified, under  ORS 200.055, as disadvantaged business enterprises,
minority-owned businesses, women-owned businesses, businesses owned by  service-disabled
veterans or emerging small businesses in complying with  the minimum standards for con-
tract specifications.
(b) The Director of Transportation, the Director of the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services and  the Attorney General may adopt rules for contract specifications relat-
ing to the use of diesel engines on site and in the course  of performing a public improvement
contract by a state contracting agency. In adopting rules  under this paragraph, the directors
and the Attorney General  shall consider the minimum standards established by the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) As an alternative  to meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, a
public improvement contract subject to subsection (2) of this section may include contract
specifications that meet the minimum standards applicable to the  public improvement con-
tract under rules adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 18a.
(1) Section 18 of this 2019 Act applies to public improvement contracts
advertised or  solicited on or after January 1, 2022, or, for public improvement contracts that
are not advertised or solicited, public improvement contracts that a contracting  agency en-
ters into on or after January 1, 2022.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 9
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, section 18 of this 2019 Act applies to
any public improvement contract  advertised or solicited on or after the effective date of this
2019 Act or, for a public improvement contract  that is not advertised or solicited, any public
improvement contract that a contracting agency  enters into on or after the effective date
of this 2019 Act, if the public improvement contract is for:
(a) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
(b) The Interstate 205 Abernethy Bridge Project;
(c) The Interstate 205 Freeway Widening Project;
(d) The State Highway 217 Northbound Project; or
(e) The State Highway 217 Southbound Project.
SUPPORTING BUSINESSES IN REDUCING DIESEL EMISSIONS TASK FORCE
SECTION 19.
(1) The Supporting Businesses  in Reducing Diesel Emissions Task Force is
established.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President  of the Senate shall appoint one member from the majority party of the
Senate and one member from the minority party of the Senate.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from the
majority party of the House  of Representatives and one member from the minority party of
the House of Representatives.
(c) The President and the Speaker shall coordinate to jointly appoint seven members as
follows:
(A) One member of the  public who is an elected official of a government entity having
jurisdiction in an area with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter;
(B) Two members of the public who represent organizations concerned  with the impacts
of diesel emissions on health and communities;
(C) One member of the public who represents the trucking or freight industry;
(D) One member of the public who represents a business that operates equipment that
is likely to be powered by diesel engines;
(E) One member of the public who represents contractors or businesses that retain the
services of subcontractors that operate motor vehicles or equipment powered by diesel  en-
gines; and
(F) One member of the public who represents environmental justice communities.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Consider public funding strategies for supporting  businesses in reducing emissions
from diesel engines used in the course of conducting business activities.
(b) Evaluate and  develop recommendations related to funding strategies that shall in-
clude, but need not be limited to:
(A) Taxes;
(B) Fees;
(C) Contract requirements or funding set-asides; and
(D) Strategies employed by other  states to accrue funds for diesel emissions reduction
programs.
(c) Develop statewide incentive strategies to encourage  replacement, repower or
retrofitting of medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks owned by  owners located outside
Multnomah, Clackamas  or Washington County, taking into consideration the incentive
strategies employed by adjoining states.
(d) Identify the barriers to small contractor participation in public contracting that exist
under clean diesel in public contracting provisions.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 10
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force, except that in the event of a tie vote,  the vote of the chairperson
shall decide the action.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall first convene no later than September 15, 2019, and  shall meet
at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to environment and natural resources no later than September 15, 2020.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff  support to the task
force.
(12) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 20.
Section 19 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 21.  ORS 468A.803 is amended to read:
468A.803. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall use the moneys in the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund to award:
(a) Grants and loans to the owners and  operators of motor vehicles powered by diesel engines,
and equipment powered by nonroad diesel engines, for up to  25 percent of the certified costs of
qualifying replacements as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
(b) Grants and loans to the owners and operators of diesel engines for up to 100 percent of  the
certified costs of qualifying retrofits as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
(c) Grants  and loans to the owners and operators of nonroad diesel engines for up to 25 percent
of the certified costs of qualifying repowers as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799; and
(d) Grants to the owners of Oregon diesel truck engines to scrap those engines.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule may set  grant or loan award rates at a
percentage that is greater than a percentage allowed under subsection  (1) of this section, provided
that the grant or loan assistance will not exceed the cost-effectiveness  threshold, if the higher per-
centage award rate would:
(a) Benefit sensitive populations or areas with elevated concentrations  of diesel particulate
matter; or
(b) Otherwise increase participation by those categories of owners or operators.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan under this section,  the department must reduce
the incremental  cost of a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit by the value of any existing
financial incentive that directly reduces the cost of the qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit,
including tax credits, other grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance.
(4) The department  may certify third parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and
retrofits and may contract with third parties to perform such services for  the certified costs of
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 11
qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits. The department  may also contract with institutions
of higher education or other  public bodies as defined by ORS 174.109 to train and certify third
parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits.
(5) The department may not award a grant or loan  for a replacement, repower or retrofit under
subsection (1) of this  section unless the grant or loan applicant demonstrates to the department’s
satisfaction that the resulting equivalent motor vehicle,  equivalent equipment, repowered nonroad
diesel engine or retrofitted diesel engine will undergo at least 50  percent of its use in Oregon, as
measured by miles driven or  hours operated, for the three years following the replacement, repower
or retrofit.
(6) The department may not award a grant to scrap an  Oregon diesel truck engine under sub-
section (1) (d) of this section unless the engine was manufactured prior to 1994 and the engine is  in
operating condition at the time of the grant application or, if repairs are needed, the owner  dem-
onstrates to the department’s satisfaction that the engine  can be repaired to an operating condition
for less than  its commercial scrap value. The commission shall adopt rules for a maximum grant
awarded under  subsection (1) (d) of this section for an engine in a heavy-duty truck and for an en-
gine in a medium-duty truck. A grant awarded under subsection (1) (d) of this  section may not be
combined with any other tax credits, grants  or loans, or any other public financial assistance, to
scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine.
(7) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any  moneys received from the federal government
that are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b) must be  used for in-
itiatives to reduce emissions  from diesel engines. Subsections (1) to (6) of this section and ORS
468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the fund received from the  federal govern-
ment.
(8) Any moneys received by the State of Oregon pursuant to  a voluntary written agreement or
a settlement approved in an administrative or judicial proceeding that are deposited in the  Clean
Diesel Engine Fund must be used by the department for activities consistent with the terms  and
conditions of the agreement or settlement. Subsections (1) to  (6) of this section and ORS 468A.797
and 468A.799 do not apply to the use of moneys in the fund received pursuant to this subsection.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may use  the moneys in
the Clean Diesel Engine  Fund to pay expenses of the department in administering the program de-
scribed in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.807.
SECTION 22. (1) Sections 3 to 7, 14 and 15 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to stat-
utes by sections 1, 2, 8 to 13 and 21 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Environmental Quality  Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality
and the Department of Transportation may take  any action before the operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary for the commission and the depart-
ments to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on  the commission and the departments by
sections 3 to 7, 14 and 15 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to statutes by  sections 1, 2,
8 to 13 and 21 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 23. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $407,718, which may be expended to carry out the
duties of the department under this 2019 Act.
SECTION 24. The unit captions  used in this 2019 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 25. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 12
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 13